dist/apertium-ido.ido.NEW.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" />
    <sdef n="adj" />
    <sdef n="adv" />
    <sdef n="vblex" />
    <sdef n="pr" />
    <sdef n="prn" />
    <sdef n="det" />
    <sdef n="num" />
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" />
    <sdef n="cnjsub" />
    <sdef n="ij" />
    <sdef n="sg" />
    <sdef n="pl" />
    <sdef n="sp" />
    <sdef n="nom" />
    <sdef n="acc" />
    <sdef n="inf" />
    <sdef n="pri" />
    <sdef n="pii" />
    <sdef n="fti" />
    <sdef n="cni" />
    <sdef n="imp" />
    <sdef n="p1" />
    <sdef n="p2" />
    <sdef n="p3" />
    <sdef n="m" />
    <sdef n="f" />
    <sdef n="mf" />
    <sdef n="nt" />
    <sdef n="np" />
    <sdef n="ant" />
    <sdef n="cog" />
    <sdef n="top" />
    <sdef n="al" />
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adv" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ar__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="inf" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pr" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="det" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="prn" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="cnjcoo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="cnjsub" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="adinfre">
      <i>adinfre</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="aerostato">
      <i>aerostato</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Alaska">
      <i>Alaska</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="altraloke">
      <i>altraloke</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="alumeto">
      <i>alumeto</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="animar">
      <i>animar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ankore">
      <i>ankore</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="apta">
      <i>apta</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="armaro">
      <i>armaro</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="astonante">
      <i>astonante</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="avelana">
      <i>avelana</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="balbutar">
      <i>balbutar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="bendo">
      <i>bendo</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="brave">
      <i>brave</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Britaniana">
      <i>Britaniana</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="chamopelo">
      <i>chamopelo</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="cirkume">
      <i>cirkume</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="debila">
      <i>debila</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="deduktar">
      <i>deduktar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="desfacile">
      <i>desfacile</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="desstopilo">
      <i>desstopilo</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="developar">
      <i>developar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="dextrana">
      <i>dextrana</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="dextre">
      <i>dextre</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="drastike">
      <i>drastike</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="dronar">
      <i>dronar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="duesma">
      <i>duesma</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ecese">
      <i>ecese</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="efekto">
      <i>efekto</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="entravar">
      <i>entravar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="erore">
      <i>erore</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="esperema">
      <i>esperema</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="evidente">
      <i>evidente</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="experimento">
      <i>experimento</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="expirar">
      <i>expirar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="fantastika">
      <i>fantastika</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="flatar">
      <i>flatar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="fontenoplumo">
      <i>fontenoplumo</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="fortune">
      <i>fortune</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="frivola">
      <i>frivola</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="garnisar">
      <i>garnisar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="giso">
      <i>giso</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="grana">
      <i>grana</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="gratuite">
      <i>gratuite</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="heroale">
      <i>heroale</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="historiala">
      <i>historiala</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="hospitalo">
      <i>hospitalo</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ibe">
      <i>ibe</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="iluzionar">
      <i>iluzionar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="infalibla">
      <i>infalibla</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="inspektar">
      <i>inspektar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Italiana">
      <i>Italiana</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="jermo">
      <i>jermo</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kalmeskar">
      <i>kalmeskar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kande">
      <i>kande</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kartilagatra">
      <i>kartilagatra</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kateno">
      <i>kateno</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="komparar">
      <i>komparar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="komprenende">
      <i>komprenende</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="koncilio">
      <i>koncilio</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="konfuza">
      <i>konfuza</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="konskriptar">
      <i>konskriptar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kontree">
      <i>kontree</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kriminaligar">
      <i>kriminaligar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kruela">
      <i>kruela</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kulo">
      <i>kulo</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Liberiana">
      <i>Liberiana</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="livrar">
      <i>livrar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="lu">
      <i>lu</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="malgre">
      <i>malgre</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="metaforo">
      <i>metaforo</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="milda">
      <i>milda</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="mimar">
      <i>mimar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="morge">
      <i>morge</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="nenufaro">
      <i>nenufaro</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="nestabila">
      <i>nestabila</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ofensar">
      <i>ofensar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="palato">
      <i>palato</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Papua">
      <i>Papua</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="perturbar">
      <i>perturbar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="pla">
      <i>pla</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="pluse">
      <i>pluse</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="priklar">
      <i>priklar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="primitiva">
      <i>primitiva</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="pundo">
      <i>pundo</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="raportar">
      <i>raportar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="recente">
      <i>recente</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="repentar">
      <i>repentar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ronronar">
      <i>ronronar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="rostro">
      <i>rostro</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="rotana">
      <i>rotana</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="silencar">
      <i>silencar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="siluro">
      <i>siluro</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="singulara">
      <i>singulara</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="sinistre">
      <i>sinistre</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="stertorar">
      <i>stertorar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="strio">
      <i>strio</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="timiana">
      <i>timiana</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="tormentar">
      <i>tormentar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="tubo">
      <i>tubo</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="unfoye">
      <i>unfoye</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="vortaro">
      <i>vortaro</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="vulgara">
      <i>vulgara</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Zimbabwe">
      <i>Zimbabwe</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
